California statutes. Education Code
(a) The county board of education shall adopt the merit system as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3, if the county has a merit (civil service) system in effect at the time of the adoption of this article as provided in Section 1310.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of Part 25, any personnel commission in a county of the third class, as described in Section 2562, may, after a public hearing, and after consultation with all affected employee organizations, adopt a regulation providing for the appointment of one or more alternate members of the personnel commission. The appointment of any alternate member shall be with the concurrence of all affected employee organizations. Thereafter, an alternate may serve only in the absence of a regular commission member.

(c) This section shall not apply to a county board of education which has been transferred specific duties and functions of the county board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1080 on or after June 1, 1977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1318.

The county board of education or county superintendent of schools may declare a holiday in the schools or offices operated by the county superintendent of schools whenever good reason exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1319.

The county superintendent of schools may employ, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2, such personnel as may be necessary to act as guards at pedestrian crossings to ensure the safety of schoolchildren who use such intersections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Unemployment Insurance [1330. - 1330.]

1330.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as appropriate, shall represent, and exercise rights of appeal to the Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board under this part on behalf of school employers held under Section 1336 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges is hereby authorized to obtain pertinent personnel records and data from any school employer and to act as an agent individually or collectively for school employers in matters pertaining to unemployment insurance. 

(c) Each county superintendent of schools shall have the responsibility of establishing, coordinating, and maintaining, either directly or by contract, an unemployment insurance management system for each school employer participating in the School Employees Fund under Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. A management system shall include general administration, claims management, appointment of hearing representatives, representation of school employers at hearings, and other duties related to the unemployment insurance program in their jurisdiction. These duties and responsibilities may be delegated to any school district, community college district, another county superintendent of schools, or any combination of these entities, including programs under joint powers agreements for the purpose of consolidation for economy and employment of specialists, including the services of a regional data center operated by a county superintendent of schools or the data-processing services of a school district or a community college district. School employers not participating in the School Employees Fund shall be responsible for the development and maintenance of their own unemployment insurance management system required by this subdivision.

(d) Each school employer shall perform pursuant to the type of financing elected, and shall, as required, respond to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the county superintendent of schools or designated agency as soon as possible, in no case later than 48 hours, to inquiries made on behalf of the county superintendent or the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in reference to any aspect of eligibility, notice of claim or appeal under the unemployment insurance program. Each county superintendent or agent thereof who is responsible for administering the unemployment insurance program shall be responsible for timely responses to any inquiry by the administrator, Superintendent of Public Instruction, State Treasurer, Controller, or other officer or person responsible for disbursements from the School Employees Fund in the State Treasury as established by Section 822 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or the Unemployment Fund in the State Treasury. Any school employer which fails to pay the contributions, interest, charges or levies within the time required shall be liable for interest on moneys due at the rate of 1 percent per month or fraction thereof from and after the date of delinquency until paid. If the school employer fails, without good cause, to pay any sums required within the time required, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount noticed, billed or required shall be made by the administrator. The administrator may for good cause waive all or a portion of interest and penalty.

(e) The administrator of the School Employees Fund shall, from available interest earnings, pursuant to investments authorized by Section 822 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, transfer each year an amount equal to two dollars ($2) per covered employee for all districts participating in the School Employees Fund under Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as appropriate. The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as appropriate, shall apportion the two dollars ($2) per covered employee amount, less actual state administrative costs not to exceed five cents ($0.05) per covered employee, to the county superintendent of schools to cover costs of administering the unemployment insurance management system specified in subdivision (c).

(f) For the fiscal year 1978–79, and each fiscal year thereafter, the administrator of the School Employees Fund shall transfer the funds by December 31 of each year based on the reports received from the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges by November 30 of each year. The reports shall be compiled from the number of covered employees as reported by the county superintendent of schools or community colleges, as appropriate, to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges by November 1 of each year, based on the covered employees employed in the preceding calendar month. The funds shall be apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges prior to January 31 of each year to the county superintendent of schools, less the actual administrative costs of the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, which shall not exceed an aggregate amount of five cents ($0.05) per covered employee. Funds for the cost of administering the unemployment insurance management system shall be apportioned to each county superintendent of schools according to the number of covered employees in each district reported by him or her, and shall be used only for the purpose of covering actual administrative costs incurred pursuant to Section 1330.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Tax-Sheltered Annuities [1340. - 1340.]

1340.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the following procedure may be utilized for payroll-related payments as limited in this section. The county superintendent of schools may designate one or more national or state banks, savings and loan associations, or federal or state credit unions with the principal office in this state, if the deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or other private insurance or guaranty of share accounts that is acceptable to the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, to act as disbursing agents for the county superintendent of schools and for school districts and community colleges in the territory under his or her jurisdiction. The county superintendent of schools may draw orders and requisitions upon the funds of the respective public employers, in favor of the designated institutions, for tax-sheltered annuities, custodial accounts, individual retirement accounts, credit union deductions, insurance plan payments, deferred compensation, withholding taxes, professional dues, and other payroll-related deductions or employer contributions. The county auditor shall follow the procedure with respect to examining and allowing the orders and requisitions set forth in Sections 42639 and 85239. The county superintendent of schools, upon receiving allowed warrants from the county auditor, shall deposit the warrants in the designated institutions. As soon as feasible following deposit, the county superintendent of schools shall furnish the designated institutions with information required to enable disbursement of payments to insurance companies, credit unions, and other recipients, including identification of the employees for whom the payments are to be made, the amount of payment on behalf of each designated employee, and the company to which the payment on behalf of each designated employee is to be made. It shall be the duty of each designated institution to disburse the payments to the recipients entitled thereto by check, bank draft, or other appropriate method, within a reasonable time after receipt of each payment, with necessary information for disbursements, which time period shall not exceed 5 working days. Designated institutions receiving deposits and making disbursements, and the county superintendent of schools, shall be deemed to be agents of the respective public employers, for payment of annuities on behalf of their respective employees, and for other payments as specified, and the moneys received by the designated institutions shall be deemed to be deposits of the county superintendents of schools. Security for the deposits shall be furnished as required by the laws of this state. The county superintendent of schools may directly prepare the information and necessary checks, bank drafts, or other appropriate instruments, on the account or accounts within the designated institutions, providing that payment to recipients entitled thereto with required information is made within the timeframe specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Retiree Benefit Funds [1350. - 1350.]

1350.

A county superintendent of schools may establish a retiree benefit fund to accumulate restricted moneys from salary reduction agreements, other contributions for employee retirement benefit payments, or both. Moneys may be transferred to the fund from other funds by periodic expense charges, in amounts based on existing and future obligation requirements. Payments from the retiree benefit fund for insurance, annuities, administrative costs, or any other authorized purpose shall be made in accordance with all warrant approval requirements applicable under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. County Boards of Supervisors [1400. - 1400.]

1400.

Except as provided in Sections 4040 to 4045, inclusive, all actions required by this code to be taken by the board of supervisors of the county in which a school district is located, shall, in the case of any joint school district, be taken by the concurrent action of the boards of supervisors of each county in which any part of the joint district is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 27.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 709 of Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Expenses [1500. - 1510.]



  ARTICLE 1. Expenses Payable From County School Service Fund [1500. - 1500.]

1500.

All expenses shall be paid out of the County School Service Fund necessary for the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools to perform the duties and render the services required by and comply with Sections 1042, 1250, 1252, 1270, 1297, 1299, 1330, 1601, 1602, 1702, 41020, 41360, 42621, 42622, 45035, 45056, 60601, 60602, 60605, 84040, 85221, 85222, 87809, Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30, and Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit support from the county general fund from being provided for duties and services performed pursuant to the sections and part enumerated above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Expenses Payable From County General Fund [1510. - 1510.]

1510.

(a) Except as provided in Section 1500, all expenses necessary for the county board of education, the county committee on school district organization, and the county superintendent of schools to comply with the following provisions are payable from the county general fund: Sections 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1240, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1290, 1298, 2600, 5425, 5426, 10020, 16061, 16166, 23000, 23002, 23003, 23004, 23005, 23006, 23008, 35102, 40000, 42124, 42636, 42638, 42643, 42662, 42670,
 42671, 42672, 42673, 42674, 42675, 42676, 42677, 42678, 42690, 42691, 42692, 42693, 42694, 42800, 44323, 44422, 44427, 44428, 44429, 44430, 44433, 44434, 44435, 44436, 44437, 44816, 44843, 44857, 45034, 45056, 45057, 48263, 49406, 52550, 52551, 85236, 85238, 85243, 85272, 85280, 85281, 85282, 85283, 85284, 85285, 85286, 85287, 85288, 85300, 85301, 85302, 85303, and 85304.

(b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit support from the county general fund from being provided for duties and services performed pursuant to sections enumerated above for those counties operating under the provisions of Section 1080.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 3.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. County School Service Fund [1600. - 1632.]



  ARTICLE 1. County School Service Fund [1600. - 1606.]

1600.

There is hereby established in the treasury of each county the “county school service fund.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

Wherever any of the terms “unapportioned county elementary school fund,” “county elementary school supervision fund,” “unapportioned county high school fund,” and “county school service fund” are used in this code or in any other law, such term shall be deemed to refer to and mean the “county school service fund.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

The county school service fund shall be utilized by the county superintendent of schools to pay the charges against the fund as are provided in this code; and to provide, with the approval of the county board of education, all of the following:

(a) Additional apportionments to any school district or community college district in the territory under his or her jurisdiction for current expenses that (1) has levied the maximum district tax and in which the annual average current cost per pupil does not exceed the annual average current cost per pupil for all districts of the same type within the county or under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools, or (2) needs additional apportionments for current expenses because of temporary emergency conditions.

(b) Additional apportionments to any school district or community college district in the territory under his or her jurisdiction for the transportation of pupils to and from school to meet temporary emergency conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

No moneys shall be expended from the county school service fund for any purpose in excess of the latest proposed expenditures for such purpose as approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction under Section 14050, without the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

It shall be the duty of the county auditor to approve warrants drawn on the county school service fund for expenses approved in the county school service fund budget; provided, however, in a county in which the board of supervisors has transferred educational functions to the county board of education pursuant to Section 1080, and a single budget has been authorized for the purposes of the county school service fund, county board of education, county committee on school district organization, and the office of the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 1620 to 1625, inclusive, and the board of supervisors has made the provisions of Sections 42649 and 85265.5 applicable in the county, orders for warrants and warrants shall be signed by the county superintendent of schools and paid by the county treasurer without the approval of the county auditor.

A listing of all warrants issued by the county superintendent of schools, where the approval of the county auditor is not required, shall be forwarded to the county auditor on the same day they are issued. The form of the warrant and the form and content of the warrant listing shall be as approved by the county auditor. The county auditor shall not be liable upon his bond or otherwise for any warrant issued where his approval is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

The title to all property purchased by the county superintendent of schools from the county school service fund is in the offices of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1606.

The money credited to the county school service fund of a county pursuant to Section 16417 of the Government Code may be apportioned by the county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, to school districts within which there is land which has been acquired by the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 31.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 709 of Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Office of Education Budget Approval [1620. - 1632.]

1620.

On or before July 1 of each fiscal year, the county board of education shall hold a public hearing on the proposed county school service fund budget for that fiscal year (the “budget year”). The public hearing shall be held prior to the adoption of the budget by the county board of education, and shall occur not less than three days following the availability of the proposed budget for public inspection. The agenda for that hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours prior to the hearing and shall include the location of where the budget will be available for inspection. At the hearing, any taxpayer directly affected by the county school service fund budget may appear before the county board of education and speak on the proposed budget or any item therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1621.

(a) The single-fund budget shall be prepared in the form prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and shall be the county school service fund budget. The budget shall show a complete plan and itemized statement of all proposed expenditures in each fund of the county office of education, of estimated cash balances, and of all estimated revenues for the budget year, and shall include an estimate of those figures, unaudited, for the fiscal year immediately preceding the budget year. 

(b) The budget may contain an amount to be known as the general reserve, in such sum as the county board of education may deem sufficient to meet the cash requirements of the fiscal year next succeeding the budget year until adequate proceeds of the taxes levied or of the apportionment of state funds are available. 

(c) The budget may contain a fund balance designated for any specific purpose as determined by the county board of education. Those funds shall be available for appropriation by a majority vote of the members of the county board of education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1622.

(a) On or before July 1 of each fiscal year, a county board of education shall adopt an annual budget for the budget year and shall file the budget with the Superintendent, the county board of supervisors, and the county auditor. The budget, and supporting data, shall be maintained and made available for public review. The budget shall indicate the date, time, and location at which the county board of education held the public hearing required under Section 1620. For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county board of education shall not adopt a budget before the county board of education adopts a local
 control and accountability plan or approves an update to an existing local control and accountability plan if an existing local control and accountability plan or update to a local control and accountability plan is not effective during the budget year. The county board of education shall not adopt a budget that does not include the expenditures identified in the local control and accountability plan and any annual update to the local control and accountability plan that will be effective for the budget year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the budget shall not be adopted or approved by the Superintendent before a local control and accountability plan or update to an existing local control and accountability plan for the budget year is approved.

(b) (1) (A) The Superintendent shall examine the budget to determine if it (i) complies with the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 for application to final local educational agency budgets, (ii) allows the county office of education to meet its financial obligations during the fiscal year, and (iii) is consistent with a financial plan that will enable the
 county office of education to satisfy its multiyear financial commitments. In addition, the Superintendent shall identify any technical corrections to the budget that must be made. On or before September 15, the Superintendent shall approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the budget and, in the event of a conditional approval or disapproval, transmit to the county office of education in writing the Superintendent’s recommendations regarding revision of the budget and the reasons for those recommendations.

(B) In addition to examining the budget of a county board of education pursuant to subparagraph (A), the Superintendent shall review and consider studies, reports, evaluations, or audits of the county office of education that were commissioned by the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, or state control agencies that contain evidence that
 the county office of education is showing fiscal distress according to the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 or that contain a finding by an external reviewer that the county office of education is at moderate or high risk of intervention based on the most common indicators of a county office of education needing intervention, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team.

(2) For the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2023–24 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall disapprove a budget, and for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall conditionally approve or disapprove a budget, if any of the following
 occur:

(A) The Superintendent has not approved a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan filed by a county board of education pursuant to Section 52070.5 that is effective for the budget year.

(B) The Superintendent determines that the budget does not include the expenditures necessary to implement the local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan that is effective for that budget year.

(C) The Superintendent determines that the budget does not provide adequate assurance that the county office of education will meet its current and future obligations and resolve any problems identified in the studies, reports,
 evaluations, or audits described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(c) In the event of the conditional approval or disapproval of the budget of a county office of education pursuant to subdivision (b), on or before October 8, the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education shall review the recommendations of the Superintendent at a regularly scheduled meeting of the county board of education and respond to those recommendations. That response shall include any revisions to the adopted budget and other proposed actions to be taken, if any, as a result of those recommendations.

(d) (1) The Superintendent shall examine the revised budget as provided in subdivision (c) to determine if it (A) complies with the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 for application to final
 local educational agency budgets, (B) allows the county office of education to meet its financial obligations during the fiscal year, (C) satisfies all conditions established by the Superintendent in the case of a conditionally approved budget, and (D) is consistent with a financial plan that will enable the county office of education to satisfy its multiyear financial commitments. The Superintendent, not later than November 8, shall approve or disapprove the revised budget. For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall disapprove a revised budget if the Superintendent determines that the revised budget does not include the expenditures necessary to implement the local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan approved by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 52070.5 that is effective for the budget year. If the Superintendent disapproves the budget, the Superintendent shall call for the formation of a budget
 review committee pursuant to Section 1623.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, if the Superintendent disapproves the budget for the sole reason that the Superintendent has not approved a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan filed by the county board of education pursuant to Section 52070.5, the Superintendent shall not call for the formation of a budget review committee pursuant to Section 1623.

(e) Not later than 45 days after the Governor signs the annual Budget Act, the county office of education shall make available for public review any revisions in revenues and expenditures that it has made to its budget to reflect the funding made available by that Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1623.

(a) The budget review committee shall be composed of three persons and shall be selected by the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education solely from a list of no fewer than five candidates provided by the Superintendent. The candidates shall be persons who have expertise in the management of a school district or county office of education, including, but not limited to, the fiscal and educational aspects of that management.

(b) No later than five working days after the receipt of the candidate list described in subdivision (a), the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education shall select the budget review committee. If the county
 superintendent of schools and the county board of education fail to select a committee within the period of time permitted by this subdivision, the Superintendent shall select and convene the budget review committee no later than 10 working days after the receipt by the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education of the candidate list.

(c) On or before November 30, the budget review committee shall review the proposed budget of the county office of education and the underlying fiscal policies of that county office of education, and shall transmit to the Superintendent, the county superintendent of schools, and the county board of education either of the following:

(1) A
 recommendation that the budget be approved.

(2) A report disapproving the budget and setting forth recommendations for revisions to the budget that would enable the county office of education to meet its financial obligations in the budget year and with regard to multiyear financial commitments.

(d) Upon the request of the budget review committee, the Superintendent may extend the deadline in subdivision (c) for a period of not more than 15 working days.

(e) The Superintendent shall develop criteria and procedures governing the performance by budget review committees of their duties under this section.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), members of the budget review committee shall be reimbursed by the department for their services and associated expenses while on official business, at rates established by the Superintendent, subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an employee of the County Office
 Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team who serves as a member of the budget review committee shall not be eligible for reimbursement by the department for their services and associated expenses while on official business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.

(a) If the budget review committee established pursuant to Section 1623 disapproves the budget of the county office of education, within five working days following the receipt of the committee’s report, the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education may submit a response to the Superintendent, including any revisions to the adopted budget and any other proposed action to be taken as a result of the recommendations of the budget review committee.

(b) Based upon the recommendations of the budget review committee provided pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1623, and any response provided pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall either approve or
 disapprove the budget of the county office of education. If the Superintendent disapproves the budget, the superintendent or his or her designee may do any of the following for the remainder of the current fiscal year:

(1) On or before December 31, develop and adopt, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools and the county board of education, a fiscal plan and budget for the county office of education that will allow the county office of education to meet its financial obligations both in the budget year and with regard to the multiyear financial commitments. The county board of education and the county superintendent of schools shall govern the operation of the county office of education for the budget year in accordance with that fiscal plan and budget. The deadline set forth in this paragraph shall be modified to reflect any extension granted under subdivision (d) of Section 1623.

(2) Cancel purchase orders, prohibit the issuance of nonsalary warrants, and otherwise stay or rescind any action that is inconsistent with the fiscal plan and budget adopted pursuant to paragraph (1). The Superintendent shall inform the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools in writing of his or her justification for any exercise of authority under this paragraph.

(3) Monitor and review the operation of the county office of education.

(4) Determine the need for additional staff and may employ, at county office of education expense, short-term analytical assistance or expertise to validate financial information if the county does not have the expertise or staff.

(5) Require the county office of education to encumber all contracts
 and other obligations, to prepare appropriate cashflow analyses and monthly or quarterly budget revisions, and to appropriately record all receivables and payables.

(6) Determine whether there are any financial problem areas and may employ, at county office of education expense, a certified public accounting firm to investigate financial problem areas.

(7) Withhold compensation of the members of the county board of education and the county superintendent for failure to provide requested financial information.

(c) The county office of education shall pay reasonable fees charged by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for actual administrative expenses incurred pursuant to subdivision (b), or costs associated with improving the county office of education’s financial management practices.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize the Superintendent to abrogate any provision of a collective bargaining agreement that was entered into by a county office of education prior to the date upon which the Superintendent disapproved the budget of the county office of education pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) As he or she deems necessary for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b), the Superintendent may seek from the county office of education, or otherwise obtain, additional information regarding the budget or operations of the county office of education, through a financial or management review of the county office of education, a cashflow projection, or other appropriate means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 6.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.

The county superintendent of schools for any county office of education that reports a negative unrestricted fund balance or a negative cash balance in the annual report required by Section 1622 or in the audited annual financial statements required by Section 41020 shall include, with the budget submitted in accordance with Section 1622 and the certifications required by subdivision (l) of Section 1240, a statement identifying the reasons for the negative unrestricted fund balance or negative cash balance and the steps that will be taken to ensure that the negative balance will not occur at the end of the budget year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.

Until the time the county office of education receives approval of its budget under this article, the county office of education shall continue to operate on the basis of the last budget adopted or revised for the county office of education for the fiscal year immediately preceding the budget year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.

The county school service fund shall be audited annually by a public accountant or a certified public accountant selected by the county superintendent of schools. The cost of the audit shall be a legal charge against the county school service fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1213, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.

On or before October 15 of each year, the county superintendent of schools shall prepare and file with the Superintendent, along with the statements received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42100, a statement of all receipts and expenditures of the county office of education for the preceding fiscal year. The statement shall be in a format or on forms prescribed by the Superintendent, in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Board of Education. These forms may be amended periodically by the Superintendent to accommodate changes in statute or government reporting standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1629.

On or before October 15 of each year, the county board of education shall adopt a resolution to identify, pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 7900) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the estimated appropriations limit for the county office of education for the current fiscal year and the actual appropriations limit for the county office of education for the preceding fiscal year. That resolution shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the board. Notwithstanding Section 7910 of the Government Code, documentation used in the identification of the appropriations limits shall be made available to the public on the date of the meeting at which the resolution is adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1630.

(a) The Superintendent shall review and consider studies, reports, evaluations, or audits of the county office of education that contain evidence that the county office of education is demonstrating fiscal distress according to the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 or that contain a finding by an external reviewer that the county office of education is at moderate or high risk of intervention
 based on the most common indicators of school agencies needing intervention, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. If those findings are made, the Superintendent shall investigate the financial condition of the county office of education and determine if the county office of education may be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or two subsequent fiscal years, or should receive a qualified or negative interim financial certification pursuant to Section 1240.

(b) If at any time during the fiscal year the Superintendent determines that the county office of education may be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or two subsequent fiscal years, or if the county office has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 1240, the Superintendent shall